Washington statutes.
RCW 36.79.090

Six-year program for rural arterial improvements—Review and revision by board.

Upon receipt of a county's revised six-year program, the board as soon as practicable shall review and may revise the construction program as it relates to rural arterials and the construction of replacement bridges funded by the federal bridge replacement program on access roads in rural areas for which rural arterial trust account moneys are requested as necessary to conform to (1) the priority rating of the proposed project, based upon the factors in RCW 36.79.080, in relation to proposed projects in all other rural arterial construction programs submitted by the counties and within each region; and (2) the amount of rural arterial trust account funds that the board estimates will be apportioned to the region.

[ 1988 c 26 s 5; 1983 1st ex.s. c 49 s 10.]